Florida, session 2026, SB662.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 12 1002.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 1002.20âK-12 student and parent rights.âParents of public 14 school students must receive accurate and timely information 15 regarding their childâs academic progress and must be informed 16 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12 17 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory 18 rights including, but not limited to, the following: 19 (4)âDISCIPLINE.â 20 (c)âCorporal punishment.âA school district employee may not 21 use 22 1.âIn accordance with s. 1003.32, corporal punishment, as 23 defined in s. 1003.01, on of a public school student may only be 24 administered by a teacher or school principal within guidelines 25 of the school principal and according to district school board 26 policy. Another adult must be present and must be informed in 27 the studentâs presence of the reason for the punishment. Upon 28 request, the teacher or school principal must provide the parent 29 with a written explanation of the reason for the punishment and 30 the name of the other adult who was present. 31 2.âA district school board having a policy authorizing the 32 use of corporal punishment as a form of discipline shall include 33 in such policy a requirement that a parent provide consent for 34 the school to administer corporal punishment. The district 35 school board policy may require such consent for the school 36 year, or before each administration. The district school board 37 shall review its policy on corporal punishment once every 3 38 years during a district school board meeting held pursuant to s. 39 1001.372. The district school board shall take public testimony 40 at the board meeting. If such board meeting is not held in 41 accordance with this subparagraph, the portion of the district 42 school boardâs policy authorizing corporal punishment expires. 43 Section 2.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 44 1003.32, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 45 1003.32âAuthority of teacher; responsibility for control of 46 students; district school board and principal duties.âSubject to 47 law and to the rules of the district school board, each teacher 48 or other member of the staff of any school shall have such 49 authority for the control and discipline of students as may be 50 assigned to him or her by the principal or the principalâs 51 designated representative and shall keep good order in the 52 classroom and in other places in which he or she is assigned to 53 be in charge of students. 54 (1)âIn accordance with this section and within the 55 framework of the district school boardâs code of student 56 conduct, teachers and other instructional personnel shall have 57 the authority to undertake any of the following actions in 58 managing student behavior and ensuring the safety of all 59 students in their classes and school and their opportunity to 60 learn in an orderly and disciplined classroom: 61 (k)âUse corporal punishment according to school board 62 policy and at least the following procedures, if a teacher feels 63 that corporal punishment is necessary: 64 1.âThe use of corporal punishment shall be approved in 65 principle by the principal before it is used, but approval is 66 not necessary for each specific instance in which it is used. 67 The principal shall prepare guidelines for administering such 68 punishment which identify the types of punishable offenses, the 69 conditions under which the punishment shall be administered, and 70 the specific personnel on the school staff authorized to 71 administer the punishment. 72 2.âA teacher or principal may administer corporal 73 punishment only in the presence of another adult who is informed 74 beforehand, and in the studentâs presence, of the reason for the 75 punishment. 76 3.âA teacher or principal who has administered punishment 77 shall, upon request, provide the studentâs parent with a written 78 explanation of the reason for the punishment and the name of the 79 other adult who was present. 80 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph 81 (b) of subsection (2) of section 1006.07, Florida Statutes, are 82 amended to read: 83 1006.07âDistrict school board duties relating to student 84 discipline and school safety.âThe district school board shall 85 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the 86 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper 87 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the 88 welfare of students, including: 89 (1)âCONTROL OF STUDENTS.â 90 (a)âAdopt rules for the control, discipline, in-school 91 suspension, suspension, and expulsion of students and decide all 92 cases recommended for expulsion. Suspension hearings are 93 exempted from the provisions of chapter 120. Expulsion hearings 94 shall be governed by ss. 120.569 and 120.57(2) and are exempt 95 from s. 286.011. However, the studentâs parent must be given 96 notice of the provisions of s. 286.011 and may elect to have the 97 hearing held in compliance with that section. The district 98 school board may prohibit the use of corporal punishment, if the 99 district school board adopts or has adopted a written program of 100 alternative control or discipline. 101 (2)âCODE OF STUDENT CONDUCT.âAdopt a code of student 102 conduct for elementary schools and a code of student conduct for 103 middle and high schools and distribute the appropriate code to 104 all teachers, school personnel, students, and parents, at the 105 beginning of every school year. Each code shall be organized and 106 written in language that is understandable to students and 107 parents and shall be discussed at the beginning of every school 108 year in student classes, school advisory council meetings, and 109 parent and teacher association or organization meetings. Each 110 code shall be based on the rules governing student conduct and 111 discipline adopted by the district school board and shall be 112 made available in the student handbook or similar publication. 113 Each code shall include, but is not limited to: 114 (b)âProcedures to be followed for acts requiring 115 discipline, including corporal punishment. 116 Section 4.âSubsection (5) of section 1012.28, Florida 117 Statutes, is amended to read: 118 1012.28âPublic school personnel; duties of school 119 principals.â 120 (5)âEach school principal shall perform such duties as may 121 be assigned by the district school superintendent, pursuant to 122 the rules of the district school board. Such rules shall 123 include, but are not limited to, rules relating to 124 administrative responsibility, instructional leadership in 125 implementing the state academic standards and the overall 126 educational program of the school to which the school principal 127 is assigned, submission of personnel recommendations to the 128 district school superintendent, administrative responsibility 129 for records and reports, administration of corporal punishment, 130 and student suspension. 131 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.